Utah statutes.
48-3a-1202.   Notice of limitation on liability of a series.

(1)  Notice in a limited liability company's certificate of organization of the limitation on liabilities of a series as referenced in Subsection 48-3a-1201(2)(e) is sufficient for all purposes of this part whether or not the limited liability company has established a series at the time the notice is included in the certificate of organization.

(2)  The notice of a limitation on liability of a series as referenced in Subsection 48-3a-1201(2)(e) is not required to reference a specific series.

(3)  The filing by the division of the certificate of organization containing a notice of the limitation on liabilities of a series constitutes notice of the limitation on liabilities of the series.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

